North Carolina, session 2025, SB863.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 131D-2.11 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d) Streamlining of Inspections. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and to the
extent permissible under federal law and regulation, if an adult care home licensed under this
Article has passed an inspection related to its facility, real property, workplace, or workplace
safety conducted by the Adult Care Licensure Section of the Division of Health Service
Regulation of the Department in the immediately preceding three months before a substantially
similar routine inspection is conducted by any other State or local department, agency, board, or
commission, then the passing results of the inspection by the Adult Care Licensure Section shall
be accepted by the other inspecting entity as if it had conducted its own inspection, and the other
inspecting entity shall deem the substantially similar inspection as having been passed.
This subsection shall not apply to any complaint investigation, follow-up inspection,
monitoring visits, investigation of abuse, neglect, resident harm, exploitation, or any inspection
or investigation based on a specific allegation, incident, referral, or concern involving resident
health, safety, welfare, or resident rights. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the authority of
the Secretary, the Department, the Division of Health Service Regulation, a county department
of social services, or any other State or local inspecting entity to conduct an inspection or
investigation in response to a complaint, incident, referral, or concern involving resident health,
safety, welfare, or resident rights.
Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit an otherwise authorized agency from conducting an
independent inspection where the agency has reasonable cause to believe conditions affecting
resident health, safety, welfare, fire protection, or workplace safety have changed since the prior
inspection.
For the purposes of this subsection, "substantially similar routine inspection" means an
inspection evaluating materially similar physical conditions under materially similar regulatory
standards.
For the purposes of this subsection, a facility will be deemed to have passed an inspection
when the inspection resulted in no deficiencies, violations, citations, or corrective action
requirements related to the subject matter of the substantially similar routine inspection."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Service Regulation, the sum of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for
the streamlining of adult care home inspections.
*S863-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies to
inspections conducted on or after that date. Section 2 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 863-Second Edition